Illinois, session 104th, HB4854.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Sections 5.1038 and 6z-149 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Public, Educational, and Governmental 8Programming Fund. 9    (30 ILCS 105/6z-149 new)10    Sec. 6z-149. The Public, Educational, and Governmental 11Programming Fund; creation.12    (a) The Public, Educational, and Governmental Programming 13Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 14Fund may accept moneys from any lawful source. Any interest 15earned on moneys in the Fund shall be deposited into the Fund. 16    (b) Subject to appropriation, moneys in the Public, 17Educational, and Governmental Programming Fund shall be used 18by the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for 19operational and administrative expenditures related to, as 20well as the award of grants to, public, educational, and 21governmental programmers and public, educational, and 22governmental studio operators with the purpose of subsidizing   HB4854- 2 -LRB104 16907 HLH 30318 b1operational, capital, and equipment costs related to producing 2and procuring that programming. 3    (c) On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of 4Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall adopt rules 5establishing requirements for the distribution of grant moneys 6and the determination of which persons or entities are 7eligible for grants under this Section and may adopt any other 8rules necessary to implement this Section and administer the 9Public, Educational, and Governmental Programming Fund.  10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.